Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.121.030

Selection of participants—Selection committee—Selection criteria.

(1) The university shall select participants based on an application process conducted by the university.

(2) The university shall establish a selection committee for screening and selecting recipients of the conditional scholarships. The selection committee shall include at least two representatives from the college, at least one of whom is a faculty member teaching in food animal veterinary medicine, and at least one representative from the beef, dairy, or sheep industry.

(3) The selection criteria shall emphasize factors demonstrating a sustained interest in food animals and serving the needs of Washington's agricultural communities. The criteria shall also take into account the need for food animal veterinarians in diverse areas of the state and allocate funds in a manner designed to represent a cross section of geographic locations.

[ 2008 c 208 s 4.]